Maine, session 132, LD1591.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §566 is enacted to read:
§566. Allowance of differential mill rates and classification ratios of property
according to use
If an amendment to the Constitution of Maine allows such an assessment, a
municipality may assess differential mill rates, classification ratios or other means of
differential taxation of property according to use, including:
1. Homestead residences. Homestead residences;
2. Nonhomestead residential property. Nonhomestead residential property; and
3. Property for commercial use. Property for commercial use.
Property must be taxed consistently across all types of property used for similar
purposes. If property is used for commercial purposes constituting more than 25% of the
property, property tax must be calculated for that portion according to use.
For purposes of this section, "classification ratio" means a comparison of the effective
tax rates for 2 types of property.